Wisconsin, session 2025, AB202.
do enact as follows:AB202,1Section 1. 421.103 (5) of the statutes is created to read:421.103 (5) Chapters 421 to 427 do not apply to residential rental agreements governed under s. 710.15 or ch. 704.AB202,2Section 2. 704.44 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 Residential rental agreement that contains certain provisions is void. (intro.) Notwithstanding s. 704.02, a residential rental agreement is void and unenforceable if it and subject to s. 704.445, a tenant may elect to void a residential rental agreement, or sever a prohibited provision from a residential rental agreement, if the residential rental agreement does any of the following, all of which are prohibited provisions for purposes of this section and s. 704.445:AB202,3Section 3. 704.44 (1m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (1m) (intro.) Allows By its express language specifically authorizes a landlord to do any of the following because a tenant has contacted an entity for law enforcement services, health services, or safety services:AB202,4Section 4. 704.44 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (2m) Authorizes By its express language specifically authorizes the eviction or exclusion of a tenant from the premises, other than by judicial eviction procedures as provided under ch. 799.AB202,5Section 5. 704.44 (3m) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (3m) Provides By its express language specifically provides for an acceleration of rent payments in the event of tenant default or breach of obligations under the rental agreement, or otherwise waives the landlord’s obligation to mitigate damages as provided in s. 704.29.AB202,6Section 6. 704.44 (4m) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (4m) Requires By its express language specifically requires payment by the tenant of attorney fees or costs incurred by the landlord in any legal action or dispute arising under the rental agreement. This subsection does not prevent a landlord or tenant from recovering costs or attorney fees under a court order under ch. 799 or 814.AB202,7Section 7. 704.44 (5m) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (5m) Authorizes By its express language specifically authorizes the landlord or an agent of the landlord to confess judgment against the tenant in any action arising under the rental agreement.AB202,8Section 8. 704.44 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (6) States By its express language specifically states that the landlord is not liable for property damage or personal injury caused by negligent acts or omissions of the landlord. This subsection does not affect ordinary maintenance obligations of a tenant under s. 704.07 or assumed by a tenant under a rental agreement or other written agreement between the landlord and the tenant.AB202,9Section 9. 704.44 (7) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (7) (intro.) Imposes By its express language specifically imposes liability on a tenant for any of the following:AB202,10Section 10. 704.44 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (8) Waives By its express language specifically waives any statutory or other legal obligation on the part of the landlord to deliver the premises in a fit or habitable condition or to maintain the premises during the tenant’s tenancy.AB202,11Section 11. 704.44 (9) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (9) Allows By its express language specifically authorizes the landlord to terminate the tenancy of a tenant based solely on the commission of a crime in or on the rental property if the tenant, or someone who lawfully resides with the tenant, is the victim, as defined in s. 950.02 (4), of that crime.AB202,12Section 12. 704.44 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:704.44 (10) Allows By its express language specifically authorizes the landlord to terminate the tenancy of a tenant for a crime committed in relation to the rental property and the rental agreement does not include the notice required under s. 704.14.AB202,13Section 13. 704.445 of the statutes is created to read:704.445 Remedies for voidable residential rental agreements. (1) If a tenant elects to void the tenant’s residential agreement under s. 704.44, the tenant’s tenancy shall become a periodic tenancy, as defined under s. 704.01 (2), and the tenant shall be responsible for the payment of rent, utilities, parking, and other charges under terms and conditions identical to the terms and conditions as set forth in the original residential rental agreement, but not including a provision described under s. 704.44 (1m) to (10).(2) If a tenant elects to sever a prohibited provision from his or her residential rental agreement as provided under s. 704.44, the unsevered portion of the residential rental agreement shall be given full effect.(3) A tenant’s election to void or sever a prohibited provision from his or her residential rental agreement as provided under s. 704.44 is effective upon the tenant giving notice of the election to the landlord in the same manner as specified in s. 704.21 (2).(4) A person suffering pecuniary loss directly caused by a residential rental agreement’s inclusion of a provision described under s. 704.44 (1m) to (10) may sue for damages therefor in any court of competent jurisdiction and shall recover twice the amount of such pecuniary loss, together with costs, including a reasonable attorney fee. There is a presumption that payments for rent, parking, and utilities are made by tenants in exchange for the value of the possession of the premises and usage of the utilities and are not pecuniary losses. This presumption may be rebutted by proof in the greater weight of the credible evidence that a tenant has incurred a pecuniary loss directly caused by a residential rental agreement's inclusion of a provision described under s. 704.44 (1m) to (10), and that such inclusion resulted in the amount the tenant paid to the landlord being greater than the value of the possession of the premises and usage of the utilities by the tenant.(5) A person suffering a pecuniary loss caused by a residential rental agreement’s inclusion of a provision described under s. 704.44 (1m) to (10) is limited to the remedies provided under this section. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab202 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab202 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB202 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB202 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB202: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting